California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(ii) Subject to subparagraphs (C) and (D), a visit shall also include an encounter between an FQHC or RHC patient and a physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, clinical psychologist, licensed clinical social worker, licensed professional clinical counselor, visiting nurse, comprehensive perinatal services program practitioner, dental hygienist, dental hygienist in alternative practice, or marriage and family therapist using audio-only synchronous interaction, when
 services delivered through that modality meet the applicable standard of care. A visit described in this clause shall be reimbursed at the applicable FQHC’s or RHC’s per-visit PPS rate to the extent the department determines that the FQHC or RHC has met all billing requirements that would have applied if the applicable services were delivered via a face-to-face encounter.

(iii) Subject to subparagraphs (C) and (D), a visit shall also include an encounter between an FQHC or RHC patient and a physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, clinical psychologist, licensed clinical social worker, licensed professional clinical counselor, visiting nurse, comprehensive perinatal services program practitioner, dental hygienist, dental hygienist in alternative practice, or marriage and family therapist using an asynchronous store and forward modality, when services delivered through that modality meet the applicable
 standard of care. A visit described in this clause shall be reimbursed at the applicable FQHC’s or RHC’s per-visit PPS rate to the extent the department determines that the FQHC or RHC has met all billing requirements that would have applied if the applicable services were delivered via a face-to-face encounter.

(iv) (I) An FQHC or RHC may not establish a new patient relationship using an audio-only synchronous interaction.

(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), the department may provide for exceptions to the prohibition established by subclause (I), including, but not limited to, the exceptions described in sub-subclauses (ia) and (ib), which shall be developed in consultation with affected stakeholders and published in departmental guidance.

(ia) Notwithstanding the prohibition in subclause (I)
 and subject to subparagraphs (C) and (D), an FQHC or RHC may establish a new patient relationship using an audio-only synchronous interaction when the visit is related to sensitive services, as defined in subdivision (s) of Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, and when established in accordance with department-specific requirements and consistent with federal and state laws, regulations, and guidance.

(ib) Notwithstanding the prohibition in subclause (I) and subject to subparagraphs (C) and (D), an FQHC or RHC may establish a new patient relationship using an audio-only synchronous interaction when the patient requests an audio-only modality or attests they do not have access to video, and when established in accordance with department-specific
 requirements and consistent with federal and state laws, regulations, and guidance.

(v) An FQHC or RHC is not precluded from establishing a new patient relationship through an asynchronous store and forward modality, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code, if the visit meets all of the following conditions:

(I) The patient is physically present at the FQHC or RHC, or at an intermittent site of the FQHC or RHC, at the time the service is performed.

(II) The individual who creates the patient records at the originating site is an employee or contractor of the FQHC or RHC, or other person lawfully authorized by the FQHC or RHC to create a patient record.

(III) The FQHC or RHC determines that the billing
 provider is able to meet the applicable standard of care.

(IV) An FQHC patient who receives telehealth services shall otherwise be eligible to receive in-person services from that FQHC pursuant to HRSA requirements.

(B) (i) Pursuant to an effective date designated by the department that is no sooner than January 1, 2024, an FQHC or RHC furnishing applicable health care services via audio-only synchronous interaction shall also offer those same health care services via video synchronous interaction to preserve beneficiary choice.

(ii) The department may provide specific exceptions to the requirement specified in clause (i), based on an FQHC’s or RHC’s access to requisite technologies, which shall be developed in consultation with affected stakeholders and published in departmental guidance.

(iii) Effective on the date designated by the department pursuant to clause (i), an FQHC or RHC furnishing services through video synchronous interaction or audio-only synchronous interaction shall also do one of the following:

(I) Offer those services via in-person, face-to-face contact.

(II) Arrange for a referral to, and a facilitation of, in-person care that does not require a patient to independently contact a different provider to arrange for that care.

(iv) In addition to any existing law requiring beneficiary consent to telehealth, including, but not limited to, subdivision (b) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code, all of the following shall be communicated by an FQHC or RHC to a Medi-Cal beneficiary, in writing or verbally, on at
 least one occasion prior to, or concurrent with, initiating the delivery of one or more health care services via telehealth to a Medi-Cal beneficiary: an explanation that beneficiaries have the right to access covered services that may be delivered via telehealth through an in-person, face-to-face visit; an explanation that use of telehealth is voluntary and that consent for the use of telehealth can be withdrawn at any time by the Medi-Cal beneficiary without affecting their ability to access covered Medi-Cal services in the future; an explanation of the availability of Medi-Cal coverage for nonmedical transportation services to in-person visits when other available resources have been reasonably exhausted; and the potential limitations or risks related to receiving services through telehealth as compared to an in-person visit, to the extent any limitations or risks are identified by the FQHC or RHC.

(I) The FQHC or RHC shall document in the
 patient record the provision of this information and the patient’s verbal or written acknowledgment that the information was received.

(II) The department shall develop, in consultation with affected stakeholders, model language for purposes of the communication described in this subparagraph.

(C) The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this paragraph. This paragraph shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(D) This paragraph shall be operative on January 1, 2023, or on the operative date or dates reflected in the applicable federal approvals obtained by the department pursuant to subparagraph (C), whichever is later. This paragraph shall not be
 construed to limit coverage of, and reimbursement for, covered telehealth services provided before the operative date of this paragraph.

(E) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, and make specific this paragraph by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider manuals, information notices, provider bulletins, and similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(F) Telehealth modalities authorized pursuant to this paragraph shall be subject to the billing, reimbursement, and utilization management policies imposed by the department.

(G) Services delivered via telehealth modalities described in this paragraph shall comply with the privacy and security requirements contained
 in the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 found in Parts 160 and 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the Medicaid state plan, and any other applicable state and federal statutes and regulations.

(5) For purposes of this section, “physician” shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ Medicare Rural Health Clinic and Federally Qualified Health Center Manual (Publication 27), or its successor, only to the extent that it defines the professionals whose services are reimbursable on a per-visit basis and not as to the types of services that these professionals may render during these visits and shall include a physician and surgeon, osteopath, podiatrist, dentist, optometrist, and chiropractor.

(h) If FQHC or RHC services are partially reimbursed by a third-party payer, such as
 a managed care entity, as defined in Section 1396u-2(a)(1)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code, the Medicare Program, or the Child Health and Disability Prevention (CHDP) Program, the department shall reimburse an FQHC or RHC for the difference between its per-visit PPS rate and receipts from other plans or programs on a contract-by-contract basis and not in the aggregate, and may not include managed care financial incentive payments that are required by federal law to be excluded from the calculation.

(i) (1) Provided that the following entities are not operating as intermittent clinics, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, each entity shall have its reimbursement rate established in accordance with one of the methods outlined in paragraph (2) or (3), as selected by the FQHC or RHC:

(A) An entity that first
 qualifies as an FQHC or RHC in 2001 or later.

(B) A newly licensed facility at a new location added to an existing FQHC or RHC.

(C) An entity that is an existing FQHC or RHC that is relocated to a new site.

(2) (A) An FQHC or RHC that adds a new licensed location to its existing primary care license under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1212 of the Health and Safety Code may elect to have the reimbursement rate for the new location established in accordance with paragraph (3), or notwithstanding subdivision (e), an FQHC or RHC may choose to have one PPS rate for all locations that appear on its primary care license determined by submitting a change in scope of service request if both of the following requirements are met:

(i) The change in scope of service request includes the costs and visits for those locations for the first full fiscal year immediately following the date the new location is added to the FQHC’s or RHC’s existing licensee.

(ii) The FQHC or RHC submits the change in scope of service request within 90 days after the FQHC’s or RHC’s first full fiscal year.

(B) The FQHC’s or RHC’s single PPS rate for those locations shall be calculated based on the total costs and total visits of those locations and shall be determined based on the following:

(i) An audit in accordance with Section 14170.

(ii) Rate changes based on a change in scope of service request shall be evaluated in accordance with Medicare reasonable cost principles, as set forth in
 Part 413 (commencing with Section 413.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successors.

(iii) Any approved increase or decrease in the provider’s rate shall be retroactive to the beginning of the FQHC’s or RHC’s fiscal year in which the request is submitted.

(C) Except as specified in subdivision (j), this paragraph does not apply to a location that was added to an existing primary care clinic license by the State Department of Public Health, whether by a regional district office or the centralized application unit, prior to January 1, 2017.

(3) If an FQHC or RHC does not elect to have the PPS rate determined by a change in scope of service request, the FQHC or RHC shall have the reimbursement rate established for any of the entities identified in paragraph (1) or (2) in accordance with one of the
 following methods at the election of the FQHC or RHC:

(A) The rate may be calculated on a per-visit basis in an amount that is equal to the average of the per-visit rates of three comparable FQHCs or RHCs located in the same or adjacent area with a similar caseload.

(B) In the absence of three comparable FQHCs or RHCs with a similar caseload, the rate may be calculated on a per-visit basis in an amount that is equal to the average of the per-visit rates of three comparable FQHCs or RHCs located in the same or an adjacent service area, or in a reasonably similar geographic area with respect to relevant social, health care, and economic characteristics.

(C) At a new entity’s one-time election, the department shall establish a reimbursement rate, calculated on a per-visit basis, that is equal to 100 percent of the
 projected allowable costs to the FQHC or RHC of furnishing FQHC or RHC services during the first 12 months of operation as an FQHC or RHC. After the first 12-month period, the projected per-visit rate shall be increased by the Medicare Economic Index then in effect. The projected allowable costs for the first 12 months shall be cost settled and the prospective payment reimbursement rate shall be adjusted based on actual and allowable cost per visit.

(D) The department may adopt any further and additional methods of setting reimbursement rates for newly qualified FQHCs or RHCs as are consistent with Section 1396a(bb)(4) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(4) In order for an FQHC or RHC to establish the comparability of its caseload for purposes of subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1), the department shall require that the FQHC or RHC submit its most recent annual
 utilization report as submitted to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, unless the FQHC or RHC was not required to file an annual utilization report. FQHCs or RHCs that have experienced changes in their services or caseload subsequent to the filing of the annual utilization report may submit to the department a completed report in the format applicable to the prior calendar year. FQHCs or RHCs that have not previously submitted an annual utilization report shall submit to the department a completed report in the format applicable to the prior calendar year. The FQHC or RHC shall not be required to submit the annual utilization report for the comparable FQHCs or RHCs to the department, but shall be required to identify the comparable FQHCs or RHCs.

(5) The rate for any newly qualified entity set forth under this subdivision shall be effective retroactively to the later of the date that the entity was first qualified by the
 applicable federal agency as an FQHC or RHC, the date a new facility at a new location was added to an existing FQHC or RHC, or the date on which an existing FQHC or RHC was relocated to a new site. The FQHC or RHC shall be permitted to continue billing for Medi-Cal covered benefits on a fee-for-service basis under its existing provider number until it is informed of its FQHC or RHC enrollment approval, and the department shall reconcile the difference between the fee-for-service payments and the FQHC’s or RHC’s prospective payment rate at that time.

(j) (1) Visits occurring at an intermittent clinic site, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, of an existing FQHC or RHC, in a mobile unit as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1765.105 of the Health and Safety Code, or at the election of the FQHC or RHC and subject to paragraph (2), a location added to an existing primary care clinic
 license by the State Department of Public Health prior to January 1, 2017, shall be billed by and reimbursed at the same rate as the FQHC or RHC that either established the intermittent clinic site or mobile unit, or that held the clinic license to which the location was added prior to January 1, 2017.

(2) If an FQHC or RHC with at least one additional location on its primary care clinic license that was added by the State Department of Public Health prior to January 1, 2017, applies for an adjustment to its per-visit rate based on a change in the scope of services provided by the FQHC or RHC as described in subdivision (e), all locations on the FQHC’s or RHC’s primary care clinic license shall be subject to a scope-of-service adjustment in accordance with either paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (i), as selected by the FQHC or RHC.

(3) This subdivision does not preclude or
 otherwise limit the right of the FQHC or RHC to request a scope-of-service adjustment to the rate.

(k) An FQHC or RHC may elect to have pharmacy or dental services reimbursed on a fee-for-service basis, utilizing the current fee schedules established for those services. These costs shall be adjusted out of the FQHC’s or RHC’s clinic base rate as scope-of-service changes. An FQHC or RHC that reverses its election under this subdivision shall revert to its prior rate, subject to an increase to account for all Medicare Economic Index increases occurring during the intervening time period, and subject to any increase or decrease associated with applicable scope-of-service adjustments as provided in subdivision (e).

(l) Reimbursement for Drug Medi-Cal services shall be provided pursuant to this subdivision.

(1) An
 FQHC or RHC may elect to have Drug Medi-Cal services reimbursed directly from a county or the department under contract with the FQHC or RHC pursuant to paragraph (4).

(2) (A) For an FQHC or RHC to receive reimbursement for Drug Medi-Cal services directly from the county or the department under contract with the FQHC or RHC pursuant to paragraph (4), costs associated with providing Drug Medi-Cal services shall not be included in the FQHC’s or RHC’s per-visit PPS rate. For purposes of this subdivision, the costs associated with providing Drug Medi-Cal services shall not be considered to be within the FQHC’s or RHC’s clinic base PPS rate if in delivering Drug Medi-Cal services the clinic uses different clinical staff at a different location.

(B) If the FQHC or RHC does not use different clinical staff at a different location to deliver Drug Medi-Cal services,
 the FQHC or RHC shall submit documentation, in a manner determined by the department, that the current per-visit PPS rate does not include any costs related to rendering Drug Medi-Cal services, including costs related to utilizing space in part of the FQHC’s or RHC’s building, that are or were previously calculated as part of the clinic’s base PPS rate.

(3) If the costs associated with providing Drug Medi-Cal services are within the FQHC’s or RHC’s clinic base PPS rate, as determined by the department, the Drug Medi-Cal services costs shall be adjusted out of the FQHC’s or RHC’s per-visit PPS rate as a change in scope of service.

(A) An FQHC or RHC shall submit to the department a scope-of-service change request to adjust the FQHC’s or RHC’s clinic base PPS rate after the first full fiscal year of rendering Drug Medi-Cal services outside of the PPS rate. Notwithstanding
 subdivision (e), the scope-of-service change request shall include a full fiscal year of activity that does not include Drug Medi-Cal services costs.

(B) An FQHC or RHC may submit requests for scope-of-service change under this subdivision only within 90 days following the beginning of the FQHC’s or RHC’s fiscal year. Any scope-of-service change request under this subdivision approved by the department shall be retroactive to the first day that Drug Medi-Cal services were rendered and reimbursement for Drug Medi-Cal services was received outside of the PPS rate, but in no case shall the effective date be earlier than January 1, 2018.

(C) The FQHC or RHC may bill for Drug Medi-Cal services outside of the PPS rate when the FQHC or RHC obtains approval as a Drug Medi-Cal provider and enters into a contract with a county or the department to provide these services pursuant to
 paragraph (4).

(D) Within 90 days of receipt of the request for a scope-of-service change under this subdivision, the department shall issue the FQHC or RHC an interim rate equal to 90 percent of the FQHC’s or RHC’s projected allowable cost, as determined by the department. An audit to determine the final rate shall be performed in accordance with Section 14170.

(E) Rate changes based on a request for scope-of-service change under this subdivision shall be evaluated in accordance with Medicare reasonable cost principles, as set forth in Part 413 (commencing with Section 413.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor.

(F) For purposes of recalculating the PPS rate, the FQHC or RHC shall provide upon request to the department verifiable documentation as to which employees spent time, and the
 actual time spent, providing federally qualified health center services or rural health center services and Drug Medi-Cal services.

(G) After the department approves the adjustment to the FQHC’s or RHC’s clinic base PPS rate and the FQHC or RHC is approved as a Drug Medi-Cal provider, an FQHC or RHC shall not bill the PPS rate for any Drug Medi-Cal services provided pursuant to a contract entered into with a county or the department pursuant to paragraph (4).

(H) An FQHC or RHC that reverses its election under this subdivision shall revert to its prior PPS rate, subject to an increase to account for all Medicare Economic Index increases occurring during the intervening time period, and subject to any increase or decrease associated with the applicable scope-of-service adjustments as provided for in subdivision (e).

(4) Reimbursement for Drug Medi-Cal services shall be determined according to subparagraph (A) or (B), depending on whether the services are provided in a county that participates in the Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system (DMC-ODS).

(A) In a county that participates in the DMC-ODS, the FQHC or RHC shall receive reimbursement pursuant to a mutually agreed upon contract entered into between the county or county designee and the FQHC or RHC. If the county or county designee refuses to contract with the FQHC or RHC, the FQHC or RHC may follow the contract denial process set forth in the Special Terms and Conditions.

(B) In a county that does not participate in the DMC-ODS, the FQHC or RHC shall receive reimbursement pursuant to a mutually agreed upon contract entered into between the county and the FQHC or RHC. If the county refuses to contract with the FQHC or RHC,
 the FQHC or RHC may request to contract directly with the department and shall be reimbursed for those services at the Drug Medi-Cal fee-for-service rate.

(5) The department shall not reimburse an FQHC or RHC pursuant to subdivision (h) for the difference between its per-visit PPS rate and any payments for Drug Medi-Cal services made pursuant to this subdivision.

(6) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system” or “DMC-ODS” means the Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system authorized under the California Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration, Number 11-W-00193/9, as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and described in the Special Terms and Conditions.

(B) “Special
 Terms and Conditions” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (o) of Section 14184.10.

(m) Reimbursement for specialty mental health services shall be provided pursuant to this subdivision.

(1) An FQHC or RHC and one or more mental health plans that contract with the department pursuant to Section 14712 may mutually elect to enter into a contract to have the FQHC or RHC provide specialty mental health services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries as part of the mental health plan’s network.

(2) (A) For an FQHC or RHC to receive reimbursement for specialty mental health services pursuant to a contract entered into with the mental health plan under paragraph (1), the costs associated with providing specialty mental health services shall not be included in the FQHC’s or RHC’s per-visit PPS rate. For
 purposes of this subdivision, the costs associated with providing specialty mental health services shall not be considered to be within the FQHC’s or RHC’s clinic base PPS rate if in delivering specialty mental health services the clinic uses different clinical staff at a different location.

(B) If the FQHC or RHC does not use different clinical staff at a different location to deliver specialty mental health services, the FQHC or RHC shall submit documentation, in a manner determined by the department, that the current per-visit PPS rate does not include any costs related to rendering specialty mental health services, including costs related to utilizing space in part of the FQHC’s or RHC’s building, that are or were previously calculated as part of the clinic’s base PPS rate.

(3) If the costs associated with providing specialty mental health services are within the FQHC’s or
 RHC’s clinic base PPS rate, as determined by the department, the specialty mental health services costs shall be adjusted out of the FQHC’s or RHC’s per-visit PPS rate as a change in scope of service.

(A) An FQHC or RHC shall submit to the department a scope-of-service change request to adjust the FQHC’s or RHC’s clinic base PPS rate after the first full fiscal year of rendering specialty mental health services outside of the PPS rate. Notwithstanding subdivision (e), the scope-of-service change request shall include a full fiscal year of activity that does not include specialty mental health costs.

(B) An FQHC or RHC may submit requests for a scope-of-service change under this subdivision only within 90 days following the beginning of the FQHC’s or RHC’s fiscal year. Any scope-of-service change request under this subdivision approved by the department is retroactive to the first
 day that specialty mental health services were rendered and reimbursement for specialty mental health services was received outside of the PPS rate, but the effective date shall not be earlier than January 1, 2018.

(C) The FQHC or RHC may bill for specialty mental health services outside of the PPS rate when the FQHC or RHC contracts with a mental health plan to provide these services pursuant to paragraph (1).

(D) Within 90 days of receipt of the request for a scope-of-service change under this subdivision, the department shall issue the FQHC or RHC an interim rate equal to 90 percent of the FQHC’s or RHC’s projected allowable cost, as determined by the department. An audit to determine the final rate shall be performed in accordance with Section 14170.

(E) Rate changes based on a request for scope-of-service change
 under this subdivision shall be evaluated in accordance with Medicare reasonable cost principles, as set forth in Part 413 (commencing with Section 413.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor.

(F) For the purpose of recalculating the PPS rate, the FQHC or RHC shall provide upon request to the department verifiable documentation as to which employees spent time, and the actual time spent, providing federally qualified health center services or rural health center services and specialty mental health services.

(G) After the department approves the adjustment to the FQHC’s or RHC’s clinic base PPS rate, an FQHC or RHC shall not bill the PPS rate for any specialty mental health services that are provided pursuant to a contract entered into with a mental health plan pursuant to paragraph (1).

(H) An FQHC or RHC that reverses its election under this subdivision shall revert to its prior PPS rate, subject to an increase to account for all Medicare Economic Index increases occurring during the intervening time period, and subject to any increase or decrease associated with the applicable scope-of-service adjustments as provided for in subdivision (e).

(4) The department shall not reimburse an FQHC or RHC pursuant to subdivision (h) for the difference between its per-visit PPS rate and any payments made for specialty mental health services under this subdivision.

(n) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals and issue appropriate guidance to allow an FQHC or RHC to bill, under a supervising licensed behavioral health practitioner, for an encounter between an FQHC or RHC patient and a psychological associate, associate professional clinical
 counselor, associate clinical social worker, or associate marriage and family therapist when all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The psychological associate, associate professional clinical counselor, associate clinical social worker, or associate marriage and family therapist is supervised by the designated licensed behavioral health practitioner, as required by their applicable clinical licensing board.

(2) The behavioral health visit is billed under the supervising licensed practitioner of the FQHC or RHC, pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) The FQHC or RHC is otherwise authorized to bill for services provided by the supervising licensed behavioral health practitioner as a separate visit.

(o) FQHCs and RHCs may appeal a grievance or complaint
 concerning ratesetting, scope-of-service changes, and settlement of cost report audits, in the manner prescribed by Section 14171. The rights and remedies provided under this subdivision are cumulative to the rights and remedies available under all other provisions of law of this state.

(p) The department shall promptly seek all necessary federal approvals in order to implement this section, including any amendments to the state plan. To the extent that any element or requirement of this section is not approved, the department shall submit a request to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for any waivers that would be necessary to implement this section.

(q) The department shall implement this section only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(r) Notwithstanding any other
 law, the director may, without taking regulatory action pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of a provider bulletin or similar instruction. The department shall notify and consult with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders in implementing, interpreting, or making specific the provisions of this section, including all of the following:

(1) Notifying provider representatives in writing of the proposed action or change. The notice shall occur, and the applicable draft provider bulletin or similar instruction, shall be made available at least 10 business days prior to the meeting described in paragraph (2).

(2) Scheduling at least one meeting with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders to discuss the proposed action or
 change.

(3) Allowing for written input regarding the proposed action or change, to which the department shall provide summary written responses in conjunction with the issuance of the applicable final written provider bulletin or similar instruction.

(4) Providing at least 60 days advance notice of the effective date of the proposed action or change.

(s) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1,
 2028, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 103) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 84.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 85 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.100.

(a) The federally qualified health center services described in Section 1396d(a)(2)(C) of Title 42 of the United States Code are covered benefits.

(b) The rural health clinic services described in Section 1396d(a)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code are covered benefits.

(c) Federally qualified health center services and rural health clinic services that are eligible for federal financial participation shall be reimbursed on a per-visit basis in accordance with the definition of “visit” set forth in subdivision (g).

(d) Effective October 1, 2004, and on each October 1 thereafter, until no longer required by federal law,
 federally qualified health center (FQHC) and rural health clinic (RHC) per-visit rates shall be increased by the Medicare Economic Index applicable to primary care services in the manner provided for in Section 1396a(bb)(3)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code. Prior to January 1, 2004, FQHC and RHC per-visit rates shall be adjusted by the Medicare Economic Index in accordance with the methodology set forth in the state plan in effect on October 1, 2001.

(e) (1) An FQHC or RHC may apply for an adjustment to its per-visit rate based on a change in the scope of services provided by the FQHC or RHC. Rate changes based on a change in the scope of services provided by an FQHC or RHC shall be evaluated in accordance with Medicare reasonable cost principles, as set forth in Part 413 (commencing with Section 413.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor.

(2) Subject to the conditions set forth in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (3), a change in scope of service means any of the following:

(A) The addition of a new FQHC or RHC service that is not incorporated in the baseline prospective payment system (PPS) rate, or a deletion of an FQHC or RHC service that is incorporated in the baseline PPS rate.

(B) A change in service due to amended regulatory requirements or rules.

(C) A change in service resulting from relocating or remodeling an FQHC or RHC.

(D) A change in types of services due to a change in applicable technology and medical practice utilized by the center or clinic.

(E) An increase in service intensity attributable to changes in the types of patients served, including, but not limited to, populations with HIV or AIDS, or other chronic diseases, or homeless, elderly, migrant, or other special populations.

(F) Any changes in any of the services described in subdivision (a) or (b), or in the provider mix of an FQHC or RHC or one of its sites.

(G) Changes in operating costs attributable to capital expenditures associated with a modification of the scope of any of the services described in subdivision (a) or (b), including new or expanded service facilities, regulatory compliance, or changes in technology or medical practices at the center or clinic.

(H) Indirect medical education adjustments and a direct graduate medical education payment that reflects the costs of
 providing teaching services to interns and residents.

(I) Any changes in the scope of a project approved by the federal Health Resources and Services Administration (HRSA).

(3) A change in costs is not, in and of itself, a scope-of-service change, unless all of the following apply:

(A) The increase or decrease in cost is attributable to an increase or decrease in the scope of services defined in subdivisions (a) and (b), as applicable.

(B) The cost is allowable under Medicare reasonable cost principles set forth in Part 413 (commencing with Section 413.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor.

(C) The change in the scope of services is a change in the type,
 intensity, duration, or amount of services, or any combination thereof.

(D) The net change in the FQHC’s or RHC’s rate equals or exceeds 1.75 percent for the affected FQHC or RHC site. For FQHCs and RHCs that filed consolidated cost reports for multiple sites to establish the initial prospective payment reimbursement rate, the 1.75-percent threshold shall be applied to the average per-visit rate of all sites for the purposes of calculating the cost associated with a scope-of-service change. “Net change” means the per-visit rate change attributable to the cumulative effect of all increases and decreases for a particular fiscal year.

(4) An FQHC or RHC may submit requests for scope-of-service changes once per fiscal year, only within 90 days following the beginning of the FQHC’s or RHC’s fiscal year. Any approved increase or decrease in the provider’s rate shall be retroactive to
 the beginning of the FQHC’s or RHC’s fiscal year in which the request is submitted.

(5) An FQHC or RHC shall submit a scope-of-service rate change request within 90 days of the beginning of any FQHC or RHC fiscal year occurring after the effective date of this section, if, during the FQHC’s or RHC’s prior fiscal year, the FQHC or RHC experienced a decrease in the scope of services provided that the FQHC or RHC either knew or should have known would have resulted in a significantly lower per-visit rate. If an FQHC or RHC discontinues providing onsite pharmacy or dental services, it shall submit a scope-of-service rate change request within 90 days of the beginning of the following fiscal year. The rate change shall be effective as provided for in paragraph (4). As used in this paragraph, “significantly lower” means an average per-visit rate decrease in excess of 2.5 percent.

(6) Notwithstanding paragraph (4), if the approved scope-of-service change or changes were initially implemented on or after the first day of an FQHC’s or RHC’s fiscal year ending in calendar year 2001, but before the adoption and issuance of written instructions for applying for a scope-of-service change, the adjusted reimbursement rate for that scope-of-service change shall be made retroactive to the date the scope-of-service change was initially implemented. Scope-of-service changes under this paragraph shall be required to be submitted within the later of 150 days after the adoption and issuance of the written instructions by the department, or 150 days after the end of the FQHC’s or RHC’s fiscal year ending in 2003.

(7) All references in this subdivision to “fiscal year” shall be construed to be references to the fiscal year of the individual FQHC or RHC, as the case may be.

(f) (1) An FQHC or RHC may request a supplemental payment if extraordinary circumstances beyond the control of the FQHC or RHC occur after December 31, 2001, and PPS payments are insufficient due to these extraordinary circumstances. Supplemental payments arising from extraordinary circumstances under this subdivision shall be solely and exclusively within the discretion of the department and shall not be subject to subdivision (l). These supplemental payments shall be determined separately from the scope-of-service adjustments described in subdivision (e). Extraordinary circumstances include, but are not limited to, acts of nature, changes in applicable requirements in the Health and Safety Code, changes in applicable licensure requirements, and changes in applicable rules or regulations. Mere inflation of costs alone, absent extraordinary circumstances, shall not be grounds for supplemental payment. If an FQHC’s or RHC’s PPS rate is sufficient to cover its overall costs,
 including those associated with the extraordinary circumstances, then a supplemental payment is not warranted.

(2) The department shall accept requests for supplemental payment at any time throughout the prospective payment rate year.

(3) Requests for supplemental payments shall be submitted in writing to the department and shall set forth the reasons for the request. Each request shall be accompanied by sufficient documentation to enable the department to act upon the request. Documentation shall include the data necessary to demonstrate that the circumstances for which supplemental payment is requested meet the requirements set forth in this section. Documentation shall include both of the following:
